Utah statutes.
48-3a-1021.   Merger authorized.

(1)  By complying with Sections 48-3a-1021 through 48-3a-1026:

(a)  one or more domestic limited liability companies may merge with one or more domestic or foreign entities into a domestic or foreign surviving entity; and

(b)  two or more foreign entities may merge into a domestic limited liability company.

(2)  By complying with the provisions of Sections 48-3a-1021 through 48-3a-1026 applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may be a party to a merger under Sections 48-3a-1021 through 48-3a-1026 or may be the surviving entity in such a merger if the merger is authorized by the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

